New York, session 2025-2026, S5773.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause 33 of subparagraph (i) of the opening paragraph of 2 section 1210 of the tax law, as amended by chapter 212 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (33) the county of Sullivan is hereby further authorized and empowered 5 to adopt and amend local laws, ordinances or resolutions imposing such 6 taxes at a rate that is: (i) one-half of one percent additional to the 7 three percent rate authorized above in this paragraph for such county 8 for the period beginning June first, two thousand three, and ending 9 November thirtieth, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-seven; and (ii) an 10 additional one-half of one percent in addition to the other rates 11 authorized above in this paragraph for such county for the period begin- 12 ning June first, two thousand seven and ending November thirtieth, two 13 thousand [twenty-five] twenty-seven; 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10499-01-5